District of Columbia statutes.
15-913

Applicability.

(a)

This chapter applies only to a foreign-money claim in an action or distribution proceeding.

(b)

This chapter applies to foreign money issues even if other law, under the conflict of laws rules of the District of Columbia, applies to other issues in the action or distribution proceeding.

History

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 101, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(e), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-913.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “this chapter” for “this act”.
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “this chapter” for “this subchapter”.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.